Mississippi, session 20261E, SB2004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 22 of Chapter 60, Laws of 2026 (Department of Human Services), is amended as follows: Section 22.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 2, One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00), or so much thereof, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, as created in Section 27-103-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the State Treasurer.  These funds are provided to the Mississippi Department of Human Services to establish and implement * * *a pilot Adolescent Opportunity Program to serve youth as a community‑based diversion and intervention program with the goal of reducing recidivism among adolescents.  Before expending or disbursing any funds under this section, the department shall develop a written pilot plan and enter into a grant or subgrant agreement for the administration of the program.  Any award made under this section shall be based on demonstrated need, service gaps, court referrals, and the capacity to deliver structured community‑based services.  The department shall require, at a minimum, quarterly performance and expenditure reports from recipients and may require matching support, in‑kind participation, or local partnership commitments as a condition of award the youth diversion program under Section 43-21-409. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.